Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 7

Judicial Procedures for Review of Transfers

33-3-701. Commencement of proceedings.

Judicial proceedings for the determination of whether a person may be transferred to a facility or continues to be eligible for treatment in a facility to which that person was transferred under part 3 or 4 of this chapter, may be commenced by filing a complaint in circuit court where the receiving department facility is located. The person or a parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, conservator, spouse or responsible relative of the person may initiate the review proceedings.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 5; 1989, ch. 513, § 13; 1996, ch. 1079, § 55; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 33-3-101 — 33-3-112, 33-3-201 — 33-3-203, 33-3-301 — 33-3-303, 33-3-401 — 33-3-412, 33-3-501 — 504, 33-3-601 — 33-3-603, 33-3-605 — 33-3-19, 33-3-623, 33-3-701 — 33-3-711, 33-3-801, 33-3-901 — 33-3-908 (Acts 1955, ch. 187, § 1; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 4-7, 16-19, 23-26; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 17-20, 22-25, 29-32; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 5-7, 11; 1976, ch. 489, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 763, §§ 1, 2, 10; 1977, ch. 482, § 11; 1978, ch. 533, §§ 3-5; 1978, ch. 533, § 7; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 366, § 15; 1980, ch. 838, § 5; 1983, ch. 323, § 4-7, 9, 12, 15, 16; T.C.A. §§ 33-303 — 33-307, 33-309 — 33-312, 33-317 — 33-320, 33-330 — 33-337, 33-345 — 33-347, 33-355, 33-360 — 33-362, 33-364 — 33-378, 33-382, 33-610, 33-1101; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 2-5, 7, 16-23, 34; 1984, ch. 986, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 6-13, 33; 1986, ch. 570, §§ 2-4; 1986, ch. 836, § 3, 5; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 2, 3, 7; 1988, ch. 828, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, §§ 30-33; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 2, 5-13; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 29-31, 113; 1992, ch. 991, § 13; 1993, ch. 66, § 44; 1993, ch. 439, § 1; 1993, ch. 356, § 4; 1994, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 743, § 1; 1995, ch. 320, § 1; 1995, ch. 411, § 1; 1996, ch. 669, § 1; 1996, ch. 675, § 15; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 31-47, 49-56; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-3-304 (Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 20; T.C.A., § 33-702), which was previously repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-604 (Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 9; T.C.A., § 33-363), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-620, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(e) and (f) in 1984; § 33-3-621, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(g) in 1984; and § 33-3-622, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(h) in 1984, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Collateral References.

Right to counsel in insanity or incompetency adjudication proceedings. 87 A.L.R.2d 950.

33-3-702. Notice of complaint and hearing.

Upon receipt of a complaint the clerk shall mail notice of the filing and of the time and place of the hearing to the transferee and the plaintiff and shall mail notice and a copy of the complaint to the chief officers of the transferring facility and of the receiving facility and to the transferee's spouse, parent, responsible relative, legal guardian, legal custodian, or conservator. If mailing addresses are unknown, notice may be given by any other reasonable means.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 5; 1996, ch. 1079, § 56; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-703. When hearings held — Continuances.

The hearing shall be held as soon as possible after the complaint was filed. At the request of counsel for the transferee, the hearing shall be continued for up to ten (10) days for preparation of the case.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 5; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-704. Transferee's attorney.

The transferee's attorney shall notify the court of the representation immediately after accepting it. If the transferee or others on the transferee's behalf do not employ an attorney for the transferee, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the transferee. An attorney representing the transferee shall not serve as guardian ad litem. If the court determines that the transferee is not able to understand the nature of the proceedings and cannot communicate with counsel in the conduct of the case, the court may appoint another person to serve as the transferee's guardian ad litem.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 5; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-705. Jury trial.

Either party may demand a jury trial on the issues.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 5; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-706. Place of hearings — Exclusion of public.

The hearing shall be conducted in a place where the court is usually held or in a physical setting not likely to have a harmful effect on the mental condition of the transferee. No hearing shall be conducted in a jail or other custodial facility for the detention of persons charged with or convicted of criminal offenses unless the transferee is being held in connection with the offenses. The court shall determine the place of the hearing and may exclude the public from the hearing on motion of the transferee if the interests of the transferee and the public would best be served by exclusion.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 5; T.C.A. § 33-3-612; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-707. Evidence — Witnesses — Continuances — Presence or exclusion of transferee.

The court shall give the plaintiff, the transferee, and all other persons to whom the clerk is required to give notice of the proceeding an opportunity to appear at the hearing, to testify, and to present and cross-examine witnesses.

The transferee shall be present at the hearing unless the transferee waives the right to be present in writing. If the transferee's attorney shows that the transferee's physical health would be endangered by being at the hearing, the court may order a continuance until the risk is terminated. If the court determines that the transferee's conduct at the hearing is so violent or otherwise disruptive that it creates a serious risk of harm to the transferee or others at the hearing or so disrupts the proceedings that they cannot be conducted in a proper manner, the court may order the transferee restrained or excluded to the extent necessary to the proper conduct of the proceedings. If the transferee is not present at or is excluded from the hearing, the court shall make a written fact finding as to why the hearing is held in the transferee's absence.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 5; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-708. Hearings informal.

The hearing shall be conducted in as informal a manner as may be consistent with orderly procedure.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 5; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-709. Testimony of examining professionals — Depositions and affidavits.

The testimony of an examining professional may be made by deposition or affidavit only with the consent of the transferee's counsel. If the testimony is given by deposition or affidavit, the court shall make a specific finding of fact that the transferee's counsel has consented, and the transferee's right of cross-examination of the examining professional shall be preserved. If consent is not given for testimony by deposition or affidavit, a professional who would be qualified as an examining professional under the commitment statute may testify instead of an examining professional, if the person has examined the transferee within ten (10) days of the hearing.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 5; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-710. Findings by court or jury.

If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence under the transfer statute that the transferee is subject to transfer or continues to be eligible for care and treatment in a facility to which the person was transferred, the court shall so declare. If the court finds otherwise, the court shall order the person's transfer from the receiving facility to the transferring facility or shall order that the person not be transferred to the proposed facility. Findings of a jury with respect to the transfer criteria shall be reported by special verdict.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 5; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-711. Limitations on filing complaint.

No complaint under this part may be filed by or on behalf of a transferee within six (6) months after a hearing on a previous complaint under this part.

Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 5; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.